District of Columbia statutes.
15-322

Enforcement of decrees for delivery of chattels.

In addition to the procedures for enforcement of judgments or decrees otherwise provided for, an order or decree for the delivery of chattels may be enforced by the same writs as are used in the action of replevin at common law.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 528, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 15-322.
1973 Ed., § 15-322.